Utah statutes.
17-27a-212.   Notice for an amendment to public improvements in a subdivision or development.

Prior to implementing an amendment to adopted specifications for public improvements that apply to a subdivision or development, a county shall give 30 days mailed notice and an opportunity to comment to anyone who has requested the notice in writing.



Enacted by Chapter 216, 2012 General Session

